Hawaii statutes.
§437D-10 Pamphleting requirements.
Before the execution of a rental agreement, each lessor who offers a damage
waiver option to a lessee shall provide to the lessee a pamphlet, written in
plain language, that includes all of the information described in section
437D-5(a)(1) through (6). The requirements of this section shall be deemed to
be satisfied if the lessor places the pamphlets prominently and conspicuously
on the rental desk, countertop, or in a wall holder, where the pamphlets may be
easily seen and reached by lessees and potential lessees. [L 1988, c 251, pt of
§2; am L 2009, c 148, §10]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next